Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
425

PARTNERSHIPS

Part I. General Partnerships

Section

425-1 Registration and annual statements

425-1.5 Filing in office of the director;
effective time and

date

425-1.6 Filing requirements; filing duty of the
director

425-1.7 Correcting a filed document

425-1.8 Execution of statements

425-2 Forms to be furnished by director

425-3 Foreign partnerships, powers and
liabilities

425-3.5 Activities not constituting transacting
business

425-4 Partnership between husband and wife;
prima facie

proof

425-5 Minors and incompetent persons

425-6 Partnership name

425-7 Partnership name; change of

425-8 Reservation of partnership name

425-9 Statement of dissolution

425-10 Taxes, etc., a prior lien on partnership
property on

dissolution

425-11 Record of statements

425-12 Fee for filing documents and issuing
certificates

425-13 Personal liability and penalty

425-14 Cancellation of registration

425-15 Not applicable to corporations

425-16 Fees, government realizations

425-17 Withdrawal procedure for foreign general
partnership

425-18 Registered agent

425-19 Designation or change of registered agent

425-20 Resignation of registered agent

425-21 Service on partnership

Part II. Uniform Limited Partnership Act

425-21 to 52 Repealed

Part III. Foreign Limited Partnerships

425-71 to 77 Repealed

Part IV. Uniform Partnership Act

General Provisions

425-101 Definitions

425-102 Knowledge and notice

425-103 Effect of partnership agreement;
nonwaivable

provisions

425-104 Supplemental principles of law

425-105 Recording and notification of statements

425-106 Governing law

425-107 Partnership subject to amendment or repeal
of chapter

Nature of Partnership

425-108 Partnership as entity

425-109 Formation of partnership

425-110 Partnership property

425-111 When property is partnership property

Relations of Partners to Persons Dealing
with

Partnership

425-112 Partner agent of partnership

425-113 Transfer of partnership property

425-114 Partnership registration statement

425-115 Statement of denial

425-116 Partnership liable for partner's
actionable conduct

425-117 Partner's liability

425-118 Actions by and against partnership and
partners

425-119 Liability of purported partner

Relations of Partners to Each Other and to
Partnership

425-120 Partner's rights and duties

425-121 Distributions in kind

425-122 Partner's rights and duties with respect
to

information

425-123 General standards of partner's conduct

425-124 Actions by partnership and partners

425-125 Continuation of partnership beyond
definite term or

particular undertaking

Transferees and Creditors of Partner

425-126 Partner not co-owner of partnership
property

425-127 Partner's transferable interest in
partnership

425-128 Transfer of partner's transferable
interest

425-129 Partner's transferable interest subject to
charging

order

Partner's Dissociation

425-130 Events causing partner's dissociation

425-131 Partner's power to dissociate; wrongful
dissociation

425-132 Effect of partner's dissociation

Partner's Dissociation When Business Not
Wound Up

425-133 Purchase of dissociated partner's interest

425-134 Dissociated partner's power to bind and
liability to

partnership

425-135 Dissociated partner's liability to other
persons

425-136 Statement of dissociation

425-137 Continued use of partnership name

Winding Up Partnership Business

425-138 Events causing dissolution and winding up
of

partnership business

425-139 Partnership continues after dissolution

425-140 Right to wind up partnership business

425-141 Partner's power to bind partnership after
dissolution

425-142 Statement of dissolution

425-143 Partner's liability to other partners
after

dissolution

425-144 Settlement of accounts and contributions
among

partners

Miscellaneous Provisions--Repealed

425-145 Repealed

Limited Liability Partnerships

425-151 Name

425-152 Limited liability partnerships; formation

425-153 Statement of qualification

425-154 Amending and restating, amending, and
restating the

statement of qualification; voluntary
cancellation

425-155 Status as limited liability partnership;
cancellation

425-156 Foreign limited liability partnerships

425-157 Law governing foreign limited liability partnership

425-158 Statement of foreign qualification

425-159 Amending, restating, and amending and
restating the

statement of foreign qualification;
voluntary

cancellation

425-160 Status as qualified foreign limited
liability

partnership; cancellation

425-161 Foreign limited liability partnerships;
effect

of failure to qualify

425-162 Foreign limited liability partnerships;

activities not constituting the
transaction

of business

425-163 Annual report

425-164 Revocation of statement of qualification

425-165, 166 Repealed

425-167 Correction of filed documents

425-168 Fee for recording

425-169 Revocation if instrument dishonored

425-170 Repealed

425-171 Action by director

425-172 Personal liability and penalty

425-173 Transition rules for limited liability

partnerships and foreign limited liability

partnerships under prior law

Part V. Limited Liability Partnership
Act--Repealed

425-151 to 180 Repealed

Part VI. Miscellaneous Provisions

425-191 Repealed

425-192 Conversion into and from partnerships or
limited

liability partnerships

425-193 Articles of conversion

425-194 Repealed

425-195 Effect of conversion

425-196 Administrative order of abatement for
infringement of

partnership name

425-197 Uniformity of application and construction

425-198 Short title

Part VII. Mergers

425-201 Definitions

425-202 Foreign mergers

425-203 Merger of general partnerships and limited
liability

partnerships

425-204 Articles of merger

425-205 Effect of merger

425-206 Repealed

Note

Source notes for part I begin with L 1969, c 247 which
completely amended this part.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next